Utah statutes.
26-4-20.   Officials not liable for authorized acts.

Except as provided in this chapter, a criminal or civil action may not arise against the county attorney, district attorney, or his deputies, the medical examiner or his deputies, or regional pathologists for authorizing or performing autopsies authorized by this chapter or for any other act authorized by this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

